Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2134
Waste or trespass; purchaser on execution; rights.

Where lands or tenements are sold by virtue of an execution, the purchaser at such sale may maintain his action against any person for trespass or waste occurring or existing after his purchase.

R.S.1867, Code § 640, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8251;

C.S.1922, § 9204;

C.S.1929, § 20-2136;

R.S.1943, § 25-2134.